Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-510
Terms, defined; applicability of sections.

The terms sewage system, sewerage system, and disposal plant or plants as used herein are defined to mean and include any system or works above or below ground which has for its purpose any or all of the following: The removal, discharge, conduction, carrying, treatment, purification, or disposal of the liquid and solid waste and night soil of a municipality. It is intended that sections 18-501 to 18-512 may be employed in connection with sewage projects which do not include the erection or enlargement of a sewage disposal plant.

Laws 1951, c. 19, § 6, p. 101;

Laws 1995, LB 589, § 2.